Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-120 Prohibitions, penalty.
(a) No insurer shall issue or offer to issue any policy which the insurer
represents is a motor vehicle insurance policy unless such insurer meets the
requirements of this article.

(b) Any insurer, any producer, or any
representative of an insurer who violates subsection (a) shall be subject to
section 431:10C-117. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1989, c 195, §34; am L
1997, c 251, §30; am L 1998, c 275, §11; am L 2001, c 216, §19]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next